New Jersey, session 221, S4634.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no later than one year after the effective date of this act, the department shall adopt a maximum contaminant level for hexavalent chromium (chromium-VI) of 10 parts per billion in drinking water beginning: (1) two years after the effective date of this act for public water systems with 10,000 of greater service connections; (2) three years after the effective date of this act for public water systems with 1,000 to 9,999 service connections; and (3) four years after the effective date of this act for public water systems with fewer than 1,000 service connections. b.  The provisions of this act shall not alter the maximum contaminant level for total chromium in drinking water, as adopted by the department pursuant to any federal or State law, rule, or regulation, except that hexavalent chromium (chromium-VI) shall not exceed the maximum contaminant level of 10 parts per billion, as established pursuant to subsection a. of this section. c.  Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection a. of this section to the contrary, the department may adopt a more stringent standard for hexavalent chromium (chromium-VI) upon recommendation of the Drinking Water Quality Institute and in accordance with the provisions of section 2 of P.L.1983, c.443 (C.58:12A-13). 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.